District of Columbia statutes.
33-426

Repealed

Partner’s interest in partnership — Effect of assignment on partnership; rights of assignee.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 641, Pub. L. 87-709, § 27
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-126.
1973 Ed., § 41-326.